Washington statutes.
RCW 1.04.020

Code as evidence of the law—Rule of construction—Effect of amendment.

The contents of the Revised Code of Washington, after striking therefrom sections repealed or superseded by laws of the state of Washington enacted since January 1, 1949, as the revised code is supplemented or modified in the 1950 supplement, shall establish the laws of this state of a general and permanent nature in effect on January 1, 1951; except, that nothing herein shall be construed as changing the meaning of any such laws and, as a rule of construction, in case of any omissions or any inconsistency between any of the provisions of the revised code as so supplemented or modified and the laws existing immediately preceding this enactment, the previously existing laws shall control. Any section of the Revised Code of Washington (as supplemented or modified by the 1950 supplement) expressly amended by the legislature, including the entire context set out, shall, as so amended, constitute the law and the ultimate declaration of legislative intent.

[ 1951 c 5 s 6.]